Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.120

Employment of unregistered persons. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

It is a violation of this title for any person to employ for pay or any consideration, or pay or agree to pay any consideration to, a person to lobby who is not registered under this title except upon the condition that such a person must register as a lobbyist as provided by this title.

[ 2024 c 164 s 484; 2010 c 204 s 811; 1973 c 1 s 22 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.650, 42.17.220.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.